California, session 20252026, SB752.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6377 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:6377. (a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, any zero-emission technology transit bus sold to a city, county, city and county, transportation or transit district, or other public agency that provides transit services to the public that is eligible for the California Hybrid and Zero-Emission Truck and Bus Voucher Incentive Project funded by the Air Quality Improvement Program, the General Fund, and the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund under the State Air Resources Board.(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions shall apply: section:(1) “Articulated bus” means a 54-foot to 60-foot bus with two connected passenger compartments.(2) “Bus” means a rubber-tire vehicle designed to transport passengers by road with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than 14,000 pounds.(3) “Cutaway bus” means a vehicle in which a bus body designed to transport passengers is mounted on the chassis of a van or light- or medium-duty truck chassis, and that has a gross vehicle weight rating greater than 14,000 pounds, but not more than 26,000 pounds. A cutaway bus includes an original van or light- or medium-duty truck chassis that has been reinforced or extended. Accommodating some standing passengers does not disqualify a cutaway bus from being considered a transit bus for the purposes of this section.(4) “Double-decker bus” means a high-capacity bus that has two levels of seating, one over the other, connected by one or more stairways, of a height that is at least 13 feet, and carries between 40 to 80 people.(5) “Over-the-road bus” means a bus characterized by an elevated passenger deck located over a baggage compartment used for long-distance bus services or connecting outlying areas with central cities with limited stops.(6) “Shuttle bus” means a commercial vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 8,501 pounds or greater, sized Class 2b through Class 8, that transports passengers in a fixed destination route.(7) “Transit bus” means an articulated bus, bus, cutaway bus, double-decker bus, over-the-road bus, shuttle bus, or trolley bus.(8) “Trolley bus” means a rubber-tired, electrically powered passenger vehicle operated on city streets drawing power from overhead wires using trolley poles.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by subdivision (a) does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, or any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051 or 6201 that is deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 6051.15 or 6201.15.(d) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.